tr: Kameralar ve Optik Malzemeler > Fotoğrafçılık > Karanlık Oda > Banyo ve İşleme Ekipmanları: Kopya Stantları; Karanlık Oda Küvetleri; Banyo Tank ve Makaraları; Baskı Tepsileri, Yıkama ve Kurutma Makineleri; Rötuş Ekipman ve Sarf Malzemeleri
nb: Kameraer og optikk > Fotografering > Mørkerom > Fremkallings- og behandlingsutstyr: Kopistativer; Vasker for mørkerom; Fremkallingstanker og -ruller; Utskriftsskåler, vaskere og tørkere; Redigeringsutstyr og -materiell
pl: Aparaty, kamery i przyrządy optyczne > Fotografia > Ciemnia > Sprzęt do wywoływania i obróbki zdjęć: Statywy do reprodukcji; Zlewy do ciemni; Koreksy i szpule; Kuwety, kuwety do płukania, kuwety do suszenia; Sprzęt i środki do retuszu
nl: Camera's en optiek > Fotografie > Donkere kamer > Apparatuur voor ontwikkelen en afdrukken: Copystands; Gootstenen voor donkere kamers; Ontwikkeltanks en -spoelen; Bakjes, wassers en drogers; Apparatuur en benodigdheden voor retoucheren
ko: 카메라/광학 기기 > 사진 > 암실 > 현상/인화 장비: 카피스탠드; 암실 개수대; 현상 탱크/릴; 인화 트레이/워셔/드라이어; 리터칭 장비/용품
zh-CN: 相机与光学器件 > 照片冲印/摄影棚器材 > 暗房器材 > 照片冲洗设备: 翻拍架; 暗房洗相盆; 显影罐与片芯; 显影盘、洗相器与干相器; 修描工具与用品
th: กล้องและออปติก > การถ่ายภาพ > ห้องมืดสำหรับล้างรูป > อุปกรณ์การล้างฟิล์ม: กล้องทำสำเนา; อ่างล้างสำหรับห้องมืด; ถังและม้วนแถบสำหรับการล้างฟิล์ม; ถาดพิมพ์ ล้าง และผึ่งแห้งในการล้างอัดภาพ; เครื่องมือและอุปกรณ์ตกแต่งภาพ
el: Κάμερες & οπτικά συστήματα > Φωτογραφία > Σκοτεινός θάλαμος > Εξοπλισμός εμφάνισης & επεξεργασίας: Βάσεις αντιγραφής; Νεροχύτες σκοτεινού θαλάμου; Δεξαμενές & ρολά εμφάνισης; Δίσκοι εμφάνισης, πλυντήρια & στεγνωτήρες; Εξοπλισμός & προμήθειες ρετουσαρίσματος
hu: Fényképezőgépek és optikák > Fényképezés > Sötétkamra > Fejlesztő és feldolgozó berendezések: Másolóállványok; Sötétkamra-mosdókagylók; Fejlesztő tartályok és orsók; Nyomtatótálcák, mosó- és szárítógépek; Retusáló berendezések és kellékek
cs: Foto, video a optika > Fotografování > Temná komora > Vybavení pro vyvolávání a úpravu fotografií: Stojany na zvětšovací přístroje; Výlevky do temné komory; Vývojnice; Misky, pračky a sušičky; Retušovací vybavení a potřeby
fr: Appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Photographie > Chambre noire > Matériel de traitement et de développement: Statifs; Bacs de chambre noire; Cuves et bobines de développement; Cuves de révélation, de lavage et de séchage; Matériel et accessoires de retouche
de: Kameras & Optik > Fotografie > Dunkelkammer > Ausrüstung, Entwicklung & Verarbeitung: Reprostative; Dunkelkammerbecken; Entwicklungstanks & -spiralen; Entwicklungsschalen, Wascher & Trockner; Retuschierbedarf & -zubehör
pt-BR: Câmeras e óptica > Fotografia > Quarto escuro > Equipamento de revelação e processamento: Suporte fixo para fotografia; Bacias de quarto escuro; Tanques e carretéis de revelação; Bandejas, lavagem e secagem de impressão; Equipamentos e suprimentos de retoque
ru: Камеры и оптика > Фотография > Фотолаборатория > Оборудование для проявки и обработки: Фоторепродукционные столы; Раковины для фотолабораторий; Проявочные бачки и спирали; Кюветы, устройства для промывки и сушки; Оборудование и материалы для ретуширования
bg-BG: Фотоапарати и оптика > Фотография > Тъмна стая > Оборудване за проявяване и обработка: Скенери за негативи; Мивки за тъмна стая; Ванички за проявяване и макари; Табли, уреди за промиване и сушене; Оборудване и консумативи за ретуширане
es: Cámaras y ópticas > Fotografía > Cuarto oscuro > Equipo de revelado y procesamiento: Mesa de reproducción; Pilas para revelado; Carretes y tanques para revelado; Secadores, pilas y bandejas de revelado; Material y equipo de retoques
sv: Kameror och optik > Fotografi > Mörkrum > Framkallnings- och behandlingsutrustning: Kopieringsstativ; Mörkrumsdiskbänkar; Framkallningsbehållare och rullar; Behållare för förstoringar, tvätt- och torkutrustning; Utrustning och material för retuschering
ja: カメラ・光学機器 > 写真 > 暗室 > 現像処理機材: コピースタンド; 暗室用シンク; 現像タンク・リール; 写真現像用トレイ; レタッチ用品
fi: Kamerat ja optiikka > Valokuvaus > Pimiö > Kehitys- ja käsittelytarvikkeet: Kopiointitelineet; Pimiön altaat; Kehitystankit ja -kelat; Kehitysaltaat, huuhtelulaitteet ja kuivaustelineet; Sähkölaitteet ja tarvikkeet
hr-HR: Fotoaparati i optika > Fotografija > Tamna komora > Oprema za razvoj i obradu: Kopirni stalci; Sudoperi u tamnoj komori; Posude i špule za razvijanje; Posude za tisak i oprema za ispiranje i sušenje; Oprema i pribor za retuširanje
vi: Máy ảnh & Quang học > Nhiếp ảnh > Buồng rửa ảnh > Thiết bị xử lý và rửa ảnh: Giá sao lại ảnh/ tài liệu; Bồn dùng trong phòng rửa ảnh; Hộp tráng phim và cuộn phim; Khay in, khay rửa và thiết bị làm khô ảnh; Thiết bị và vật liệu sửa ảnh
sk-SK: Fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Fotografovanie > Tmavá komora > Zariadenia na vývoj a spracovanie: Foto stojany; Umývadlá do tmavej komory; Vyvolávacie nádržky a cievky; Tlačiarenské tácky, práčky a sušičky; Vybavenie a spotrebný materiál na retušovanie
pt-PT: Câmaras e ótica > Fotografia > Câmara escura > Equipamento de revelação e processamento: Suportes de cópia; Tinas de câmara escura; Tanques e bobinas de revelação; Máquinas de lavar e secar, tabuleiros de impressão; Artigos e equipamento de retoque
sl-SI: Fotoaparati in optika > Fotografija > Temnica > Oprema za razvijanje in obdelavo: Stojala za fotokopiranje; Umivalniki za temnice; Rezervoarji in koluti za razvijanje; Posode, pralniki in sušilniki za razvijanje fotografij; Oprema in pripomočki za retuširanje
da: Kameraer og optik > Fotografi > Mørkekammer > Fremkaldeudstyr: Standere til kopiering; Vaske til mørkekammer; Filmfremkaldelsesbeholdere og -spoler; Tryk – fade, skylleapparater, tørreapparater; Retoucheringsudstyr og forbrugsvarer
lt-LT: Fotoaparatai ir optika > Fotografija > Fotolaboratorija > Ryškinimo ir apdorojimo įranga: Kopijavimo stovai; Fotolaboratorijos kriauklės; Ryškinimo bakeliai ir ritės; Spaudinių padėklai, plautuvės ir džiovintuvai; Retušavimo įranga ir reikmenys
ro-RO: Aparate foto și componente optice > Fotografie > Cameră obscură > Echipamente de developare și procesare: Suporturi pentru copiere; Chiuvete pentru cameră obscură; Recipiente și role pentru developare; Tăvi pentru imprimare, dispozitive pentru spălare și uscare; Echipamente și consumabile pentru retușare
en: Cameras & Optics > Photography > Darkroom > Developing & Processing Equipment: Copystands; Darkroom Sinks; Developing Tanks & Reels; Print Trays, Washers & Dryers; Retouching Equipment & Supplies
zh-TW: 相機和光學元件 > 攝影器材 > 暗房 > 暗房沖洗設備: 翻拍架; 暗房水槽; 相片沖洗罐和捲軸; 托盤、沖洗盤、瀝水盤; 相片修圖工具
it: Fotocamere/dispositivi ottici > Fotografia > Camera oscura > Strumenti per sviluppo e trattamento: Stativi per riproduzioni; Lavelli per camera oscura; Vasche e bobine per sviluppo; Vassoi/vasche lavaggio stampe/essiccatori; Strumenti e prodotti per ritocchi